Massachusetts, session 194th, H4428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30A of Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, shall be amended by inserting the following paragraph at the end thereof:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the weight threshold for
determination of a superload shall be those vehicles at or in excess of one hundred and ninety-
nine thousand pounds gross vehicle weight. The department shall also implement an application
and fee schedule for expedited superload permits authorized under this section. A superload
permit may include conditions and terms as determined by the Administrator; provided further,
that allowances shall be made for escort flexibility, where practicable, and engineering studies
conducted not older than 12 months prior. For purposes of this section, a “superload” is defined
as any vehicle or combination of vehicles which exceed 14 feet in width; or 14 feet in height or
greater; or greater than 115 feet in length; or 199,000 pounds or greater in gross vehicle weight;
or a combination of the above.
of 1